Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 43
Wyoming Health Insurance Pool Act

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1, enacted these provisions as chapter 42. Since Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1, also enacted a chapter 42, these provisions have been renumbered as chapter 43.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 1997, ch. 120, § 3, effective July 1, 1997, provides: “The amendments made by this act to the Wyoming health insurance pool are intended to provide an acceptable alternative mechanism meeting the requirements of section 2744 of the federal Public Health Service Act [
42 U.S.C.S. 300gg-44 ] and the requirements of the federal Health Insurance Portability Act of 1996. The governor shall advise the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services that the state has enacted necessary legislation to provide for the implementation of an acceptable alternative mechanism designed to meet those requirements.”

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2003, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, requests Congress to equalize the tax treatment of employer-provided and individually purchased health insurance by creating a tax credit for the full amount of insurance purchased by individuals since the high cost of health insurance has created a large number of uninsured citizens in the United States and the State, those without health insurance are less likely to receive adequate health care, insurance purchasing decisions are to a large extent made by employers and not insurance beneficiaries, overreliance on employer-provided health insurance impedes worker mobility, spiraling health care costs are in part caused by a lack of active consumer participation in health care markets, and employers can deduct the full cost of employee health insurance as a business expense, while individuals may not.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Coverage under medical and health insurance plans for services performed by dentists, oral surgeons, and orthondontists, 43 ALR5th 657.